Tennessee, session 114, SB1643.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 35, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The department shall annually report the following information about the
program for the current school year to the general assembly:
(1) The county of residence of each recipient;
(2) The school and, if applicable, LEA at which each recipient was
enrolled at the time of submitting the scholarship application;
(3) The private school at which each recipient is enrolled;
(4) Each recipient's grade level;
(5) The annual household income of each recipient; and
(6) The total state expenditures for the program, including, but not limited
to:
(A) Third-party contracts;
(B) Administrative costs incurred by the department;
(C) Advertising and marketing expenses; and
(D) Number of scholarships awarded.
(b) The department shall submit the report required in subsection (a) to the
general assembly by June 1, 2026, for the 2025-2026 school year and by October 1 for
each school year thereafter.
SB1643
008811
- 1 -

(c) The report must not include personally identifiable information of students.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 008811